Massachusetts, session 194th, H2588.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 15A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official 
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 47 the following section:- 
Section 48. Establishment of a fire safety curriculum. (a) For the purposes of this section, 
the following term shall, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, have the following 
meaning:- “Institute of higher education”, all postsecondary institutions including: (i) the system 
of public institutions of higher education, established in section 5; (ii) private occupational 
schools, as defined in section 263 of chapter 112; and (iii) private colleges, universities and other 
institutions of higher learning. 
(b) All institutes of higher education shall require students to complete a comprehensive 
fire safety curriculum from an expert source. The curriculum shall cover fire safety in a variety 
of scenarios, including, but not limited to, fire prevention and escape, what to do in case of both 

of 2 12 smoldering and flaming fires, kitchen fires, electrical fires, vehicle fires, smoke inhalation, and 
carbon monoxide poisoning. Students shall complete an examination to test student proficiency.  
SECTION 2. Chapter 71 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by inserting after section 99 the following section:- 
Section 100. Establishment of a fire safety curriculum. (a) For the purposes of this 
section, the following term shall, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, have the 
following meaning:- “School”, every public or private elementary and secondary school in the 
commonwealth; provided, however, that the term school shall not include colleges and 
universities.  
(b) All schools shall require students to complete a comprehensive fire safety curriculum 
by the end of the 10th grade from an expert source. The curriculum shall cover fire safety in a 
variety of scenarios, including, but not limited to, fire prevention and escape, what to do in case 
of both smoldering and flaming fires, kitchen fires, electrical fires, vehicle fires, smoke 
inhalation, and carbon monoxide poisoning. Students shall complete an examination to test 
student proficiency.